Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1 General Provisions
3-1-103. Composition of state house of representative districts.

All census descriptions, counties, tracts, blocks, census delineations, census district lines and other census designations are those established for or by the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census, for taking the 2010 federal decennial census in Tennessee as contained in the automated geographic database, known as the TIGER (topologically integrated geographic encoding and referencing) system. All voting districts (VTDs) are precincts aggregated from such census blocks as reported to the office of management information services for the general assembly by the office of local government, comptroller of the treasury pursuant to title 2, chapter 3, part 1.

As provided in subsection (c), each district is described county by county in alphabetical order and, if a county is split, by the portion of such split county. Split counties are described by VTDs and, if further divided, by census blocks.

It is the intention of the general assembly that:

Each district be represented by a single member;

Districts must be substantially equal in population in accordance with constitutional requirements for “one (1) person one (1) vote” as judicially interpreted to apply to state legislative districts;

Geographic areas, boundaries and population counts used for redistricting shall be based on the 2010 federal decennial census;

Districts must be contiguous and contiguity by water is sufficient, and, toward that end, if any voting district or other geographical entity designated as a portion of a district is found to be noncontiguous with the larger portion of such district, it shall be constituted a portion of the district smallest in population to which it is contiguous;

No more than thirty (30) counties may be split to attach to other counties or parts of counties to form multi-county districts; and

The redistricting plan will comply with the Voting Rights Act and the fourteenth and fifteenth amendments to the United States Constitution.

Until the next enumeration of qualified voters and apportionment of representatives, the state house of representatives shall be composed as follows:

District 01:

Sullivan County

VTD: 02HV Holston View School

VTD: 02VP Valley Pike School

VTD: 03 Hickory Tree Firehall

Blocks (043202): 4029 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4050 4053 4059 4060 4061 4062 4079 4088

VTD: 04 Avoca School

Blocks (042600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048

Blocks (043000): 1003 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1046 1047 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1089 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1143 1144 1145 1146

Blocks (043201): 1000 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 2035 2036

Blocks (043401): 1000 1001 1002 1020 1021 1022 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1052 1053

Blocks (043402): 1037 1038 1039 1056 1057 1058 1059 1061 1062 1063

VTD: 06 Central Heights School

VTD: 10 Ketron Intermediate School

Blocks (042000): 1002 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026

Blocks (042100): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1057 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 3000 3001 3002 3003 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041

Blocks (042200): 2000 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2065 2066 2074 2075 2076 2077 2085 2086 2087 2088 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2099

VTD: 11C Cedar Grove School

VTD: 12K Ketron Memorial Methodist

VTD: 16CG Chinquapin Ruritan Bldg

Blocks (043202): 4063 4064

VTD: 17W Anderson School

VTD: 17Y YMCA Of Bristol

VTD: 21 East High School

VTD: 22 Holston Valley Middle School

District 02:

Sullivan County

VTD: 07 Indian Springs School

VTD: 10 Ketron Intermediate School

Blocks (040900): 1040 1041 1042 1044

Blocks (042100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1054 1055 1056

Blocks (042200): 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2064 2067 2068 2069 2080 2081 2082 2083 2089 2090 2091 2097

VTD: 11S Civic Auditorium

VTD: 11T Traders Village

VTD: 11W Kingsport Public Library

VTD: 12CB Clounds Bend United Methodist

VTD: 13P Sullivan South High School

VTD: 14CH Colonial Heights Middle School

VTD: 14MP Miller Perry Elementary School

VTD: 15 Sullivan West Middle School

District 03:

Carter County

VTD: Elk Mills

VTD: Gap Creek

Blocks (070600): 1011 1016 1017 1018 1019 1021 1022 1025

Blocks (070700): 1014 1015 1033 2024 2025 2026 2027

Blocks (071400): 1009 1019 1020 1021 1022 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1031 1032 1033 1034 1044 1045 1052

VTD: Hampton

VTD: Roan Mountain

VTD: Tiger Valley

VTD: Valley Forge

Blocks (070500): 3036 3037 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3052 3053 3056 3057

Blocks (070600): 1010 1012 1013 1015 1024

Johnson County

Sullivan County

VTD: 01 South Holston Ruritan

VTD: 03 Hickory Tree Firehall

Blocks (043202): 2022 2031 2034 2035 2036 2037 4009 4010 4012 4013 4014 4015 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4030 4051 4052 4054 4055 4056 4057 4058 4070 4071 4072 4073 4074 4075 4076 4077 4078 4080 4084 4085 4086 4087 4090 4091 4092 4097 4099 4100 4101 4102 4103 4104

Blocks (043302): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3011

VTD: 04 Avoca School

Blocks (043401): 1003 1004 1012 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1023 1025 1026 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059

VTD: 05 Sullivan Co Offices

VTD: 08 Buffalo Ruritan Bldg

VTD: 09 Piney Flats Firehall

VTD: 16BC Bluff City Middle School

VTD: 16CG Chinquapin Ruritan Bldg

Blocks (043202): 4067 4068 4069 4081 4082 4083

Blocks (043302): 2006 2010 2011 2012 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 4007 4008 4009 4010 4015 4016 4017 4031 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041

VTD: 18 Holston School

VTD: 19H East Cherokee School

District 04:

Carter County

VTD: Central

VTD: Court House

VTD: Eastside

VTD: Gap Creek

Blocks (070200): 2027 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034

Blocks (070600): 1002 1003 1004 1006 1007 1008 1009 1020 1023 1026 1027 1028

Blocks (070700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1034 2012 2013 2015 2020 2022 2023 2028 2040 2041

Blocks (071400): 1030

VTD: Happy Valley

VTD: Harold McCormick

VTD: High School

VTD: Hunter

VTD: Keenburg

VTD: Little Milligan

VTD: Midway

VTD: Range

VTD: Siam

VTD: Unaka

VTD: Valley Forge

Blocks (070200): 1092 1093 1094 1100 1101 2029 2049

Blocks (070300): 2034 2036 2053 2056 3022 3024 3025 3026 3027 3029 3030 3031 3033 3035 3037 3040 3066 3076 3077 3078 3090 3091 3095

Blocks (070500): 3018 3019 3020 3021 3025 3027 3028 3033 3034 3035 3038 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3054

Blocks (070600): 1000 1001 1005 1014 1029 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026

VTD: Watauga

VTD: Westside

Unicoi County

District 05:

Greene County

VTD: 01 Forest Hills

VTD: 02 Flag Branch

VTD: 04 McDonald

Blocks (091200): 2086 2087

VTD: 05 Orebank

Blocks (090600): 1010 1011 1012 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1021 1038 1039 1041 1043 1054 1055 1056 1057 1063 1068

Blocks (091200): 2079 2091 2092 2093 2094

VTD: 07 Mt. Carmel

VTD: 08 Mt. Pleasant

VTD: 09 Debusk

VTD: 10-1 East View

VTD: 10-1 High School

VTD: 10-1 Highland Roby

VTD: 10-1 Tusculum View

VTD: 10-2 Andrew Johnson

VTD: 10-2 Court House

VTD: 10-2 Middle School

VTD: 11 Woodlawn

VTD: 12 Hardins

VTD: 13 Tusculum Corp

VTD: 13 Tusculum North

VTD: 13 Tusculum South

VTD: 14 Chucky Doak

VTD: 15 Jockey

VTD: 16 Lost Mountain

VTD: 16 Union Temple

VTD: 17 West Pines

VTD: 19 Midway

VTD: 20 Newmansville

VTD: 21 Cross Anchor

VTD: 22 Greystone

VTD: 23 Mosheim

VTD: 24 Sunnyside

VTD: 25 Glenwood

District 06:

Washington County

VTD: 01 South Central School

Blocks (061901): 2095 2098 2099 2101 2102 2103 2104 2119 2120 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 4058 4059 4060 4065 4066 4067 4068 4069 4070 4071 4072 4073 4074 4078 4079 4080 4081 4082 4083 4084 4085 4086 4087 4088 4089 4090 4091 4092 4093 4094 4095 4096 4097 4098 4099 4100 4101 4102 4103 4104 4105 4106 4107 4108

VTD: 07 Fall Branch

VTD: 09-10 Fairmont School

VTD: 09-5 North Side School

VTD: 09-6 Stratton School

VTD: 09-7 AO Asbury School

Blocks (060400): 4016 4017 4019 4023 4048 5021 5022 5059

Blocks (060501): 3005 3007 4000 4003 4009 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4020 4031

Blocks (061402): 1117

Blocks (061701): 1025 1044 1045 1046 1056 1082

Blocks (061702): 1002 1004 1009 1016 1017

VTD: 09-9 Henry Johnson School

Blocks (060100): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045

Blocks (062000): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1039 1040 1053 3004 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4037 4038 4041

VTD: 10-1 Princeton Arts Center

VTD: 10-12E Indian Trail School

VTD: 10-12W Towne Acres School

VTD: 10S Town Acres South

VTD: 11E Boones Creek

VTD: 11I Boones Creek Elementary

Blocks (061300): 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2039 2040 2041 2042 2048

Blocks (061402): 1003 1009 1018 1021 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1034 1035 1039 1041 1043 1044 1045 1046 1055 1056 1061 1062 1063 1066 1078 1079 1080 1108 1109 1110 1112 1113 1115 1121 1123 2013 2014 2016 2017 2020 2021 2022 2039 2046 2047 2048 2054 2055 3000 3003 3004 3006 3009 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3055 3058 3059

VTD: 11L Lake Ridge School

VTD: 11M Marvin Chapel

Blocks (060501): 4001 4002 4004

Blocks (061402): 1085 1091 1102

Blocks (061701): 1017 1027

VTD: 11W Boones Creek Elementary

Blocks (061402): 1010 1011 1014 1015 1016 1017 1019 1020 1022 1023 1024 1033 1036 1037 1038 1040 1042 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1057 1058 1059 1060 1064 1065 1068 1081 1082 1083 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1092 1093 1094 1106 1107 1114 1122 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2015 2018 2019 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2040 2041 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 3001 3002 3005 3007 3008 3010 3011 3012 3032 3053 3054 3056 3057 3060 3061 3062

VTD: 12C Gray City

VTD: 12E Gray Fairgrounds East

VTD: 12W Gray Fairgrounds West

VTD: 13 Harmony School

VTD: 14 Sulphur Springs

VTD: 17 Bowmantown Ruritan

VTD: 18 Limestone Ruritan

District 07:

Washington County

VTD: 01 South Central School

Blocks (061800): 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4076

Blocks (061901): 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3037 3038 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050

VTD: 02 Conklin Ruritan

VTD: 03 West View

VTD: 04 Lamar School

VTD: 05 Telford Ruritan

VTD: 06 Embreeville

VTD: 08-1 Midway Outside

VTD: 08-14 Cherokee Inside

VTD: 08-15 Midway Inside

VTD: 08-16 Fire Training Center

VTD: 08-2 Cherokee Outside

VTD: 09-1 South Side School

VTD: 09-3 Keystone School

VTD: 09-7 AI Woodland School

VTD: 09-7 AO Asbury School

Blocks (061701): 1012 1014 1015 1016 1018 1021 1028 1033 1047 1048 1050

VTD: 09-8 Adelphia Center

VTD: 09-9 Henry Johnson School

Blocks (060100): 2046 2047 2048 2049

Blocks (060400): 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1027 1028 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2039 2042 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 5040 5041 5043 5045 5046 5047 5048 5049 5050 5051 5052 5053 5054 5055 5056 5057 5058 5069

Blocks (062000): 1011 1012 1013 1014 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 3000 3001 3002 3003 3005 3006 3007 3008 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4039 4040

VTD: 11I Boones Creek Elementary

Blocks (061402): 1111

Blocks (061701): 1001 1003 1004 1005 1007 1034

VTD: 11M Marvin Chapel

Blocks (061402): 1084 1103

Blocks (061601): 1021 1022 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1056

Blocks (061701): 1006 1013 1019 1020 1022 1023 1024 1026 1029 1030 1031 1032 1049 1055 1057 1081 2001 2002 2003 2004 2006 2007 2009 2010 2011 2015 2016 2018 2019 2021 2027 2028

VTD: 11W Boones Creek Elementary

Blocks (061701): 1000 1002 1009 1011

VTD: 15-1 Jonesborough Town Hall

VTD: 15-2 Jonesborough Courthouse

VTD: 16 Leesburg Ruritan

District 08:

Blount County

VTD: Alcoa - Rockford

VTD: Alcoa 1st Baptist

VTD: Beech Grove

VTD: Beech Grove-Alcoa

VTD: Blount County Board of Education-City

VTD: Blount County Board of Education-County

VTD: Carpenters

VTD: Chilhowee View

VTD: Fairview-City

Blocks (011102): 3048 4028

Blocks (011503): 2000 2001 2003 2004

VTD: Happy Valley

VTD: Heritage

VTD: Lanier

VTD: Louisville 8th

VTD: Maryville College

VTD: Maryville High School

Blocks (011102): 4000 4001 4002 4005

VTD: Mentor

VTD: Mentor-Alcoa

VTD: Montvale

VTD: Oak View

VTD: Porter

VTD: Rockford 20th

VTD: Rockford-Alcoa

VTD: Rockford-City

VTD: Rockford-County

VTD: Shooks Gap

VTD: Townsend-City

VTD: Townsend-County

VTD: Walland

District 09:

Hancock County

Hawkins County

District 10:

Hamblen County

District 11:

Cocke County

Greene County

VTD: 03 Caney Branch

VTD: 04 McDonald

Blocks (090600): 1049 1050

Blocks (091100): 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1056 1057 1058

Blocks (091200): 1138 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1155 1156 1157 1158 1159 1160 1161 1168 1169 1178 1179 1180 1181 1186 2019 2020 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2088 2089 2090 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2106

VTD: 05 Orebank

Blocks (090600): 1019 1020 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1040 1046 1047 1048 1051 1052 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062

Blocks (091100): 1045 1128

VTD: 06 Mohawk

VTD: 18 South Greene

Jefferson County

VTD: 03 White Pine School

VTD: 08 Chestnut Hill School

Blocks (070900): 1110 1111 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2020 2025 2026 2031 2037 2043 2045 2048 2052 2056 2057 2058 2062 2063 2064 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2118 2119 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2128 2129 2130 2132 2139 2140 2141 2142 2143 2144 2145 2174 2176 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053

VTD: 08 Old Swannsylvania School

Blocks (070900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 3009

VTD: 09 Talbott School

Blocks (070200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1023 1026 1027 1028 1032 2023 2029 2030 2031 2032 2035 2036 2037 2040 2041 2042 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3037 3038 3039 3040 3047 3049 3050

VTD: 10 Jefferson City Fire Department

District 12:

Sevier County

VTD: 10-1 Boyd's Creek Elementary School

VTD: 10-2 DuPont Community Center

VTD: 10-3 Adult H.S. (Whites)

VTD: 1-1 Caton's Chapel

VTD: 11-1 Gatlinburg Amer. Legion

VTD: 11-2 Pittman Center City Hall

VTD: 2-1 Waldens Creek

VTD: 2-2 Wearwood School

VTD: 4-1 Pigeon Forge City Hall

VTD: 5-1 Sevierville Middle School

VTD: 5-2 Senior Citizens Bldg.

Blocks (080400): 1114

Blocks (080500): 1007 1008 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2016 2021 2022 2023 2024 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2070 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 3040 3041 3042 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3081

Blocks (080801): 1002 1004 1005 1006 1007 1040

VTD: 6-1 Seymour Intmdte. School

VTD: 9-1 Seymour Primary School

District 13:

Knox County

VTD: 11 Central United Methodist Church

VTD: 16N North Knox Recreation Center

VTD: 16S Belle Morris

VTD: 17 Christenberry

VTD: 18 Lincoln Park

VTD: 19 S.O.A.R. Youth Ministries

VTD: 23N Bible Church of God

VTD: 23S Westview

VTD: 24N Pellissippi State Tech

VTD: 24Q Sequoyah Hills

VTD: 33 Richard Yoakley

VTD: 37 Inskip Elementary

VTD: 38 Inskip Elementary

VTD: 48 Pond Gap

VTD: 49 Bearden Elementary

VTD: 50N West High

VTD: 50S West High

VTD: 89 Mt.Olive

VTD: 90 Bonny Kate

District 14:

Knox County

VTD: 65 Concord

VTD: 66N Farragut I

Blocks (005803): 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1064 1065 1066 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080

Blocks (005807): 1025 1044

Blocks (005808): 1000

Blocks (005809): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041

Blocks (005810): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011

Blocks (005904): 3014 3015 3022 3023

VTD: 66S Farragut II

VTD: 69N A.L. Lotts

VTD: 69S Bluegrass

VTD: 71 Rocky Hill

Blocks (003500): 3017 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041

Blocks (005604): 2013 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2021 2026

Blocks (005701): 1000 1019 1020 2000 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3022 3023 3024 3025 3033 3034 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051

District 15:

Knox County

VTD: 06 Green School

VTD: 09 Moses Center

VTD: 10N Fort Sanders

VTD: 10S Stokley Athletics Center

VTD: 12 Eastport

VTD: 13 Fair Garden

VTD: 14E Austin-East

VTD: 14M Walter P. Taylor Center

VTD: 15 John T. O'Connor Center

VTD: 20 Beaumont

VTD: 25 South Knox Community Center

VTD: 26 Dogwood

Blocks (000800): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023

Blocks (002200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 3000 3001 3002

Blocks (002300): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009

VTD: 27 South Knox Optimist Club

VTD: 28 South-Doyle Middle

Blocks (002200): 2030 2031 2032

Blocks (002300): 1000 1010 2001 2003 2004 2005 2006 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2030 2031 2033

VTD: 30 Sarah Moore Greene

VTD: 31 Chilhowee

VTD: 32 Spring Hill

VTD: 75 Huffs

VTD: 91 Vestal

District 16:

Knox County

VTD: 34 Fountain City Library

VTD: 35 Shannondale

VTD: 36 Gresham

VTD: 39 Inskip Recreation Center

Blocks (004000): 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2034

Blocks (004800): 1009 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1034 1035 1036 1037 1053 1054 1055 1057 1058

Blocks (004900): 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2069

VTD: 56 Heiskell

VTD: 58 Pedigo

Blocks (006206): 1005 1006 1013 1020 1022 1023 1024

VTD: 59 Brickey

VTD: 61 Halls

VTD: 72E Boys and Girls Club

VTD: 72M Boys and Girls Club

VTD: 72W Boys and Girls Club

VTD: 73 Powell

VTD: 74 Shannondale

District 17:

Jefferson County

VTD: 01 Dandridge Elementary

VTD: 02 Piedmont

VTD: 04 Jefferson Elementary

VTD: 05 Jefferson Middle

VTD: 06 Rush Strong School

VTD: 07 New Market City Hall

VTD: 08 Chestnut Hill School

Blocks (070900): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2021 2022 2023 2024 2027 2028 2029 2030 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2044 2046 2047 2049 2050 2051 2053 2054 2055 2059 2060 2061 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2126 2127 2131 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2146 2147 2148 2149 2150 2151 2152 2153 2154 2155 2156 2157 2158 2159 2160 2161 2162 2163 2164 2165 2166 2167 2168 2169 2170 2171 2172 2173 2175 2177 2178 2179 2180 2181 2182 2183 2184 2185 2186 2187 2188 2189 2190 3054 3055 3056

VTD: 08 Old Swannsylvania School

Blocks (070700): 1031 1032 1033 1034 1058 1059 1060 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1104 1105

VTD: 09 Talbott School

Blocks (070200): 1021 1022 1024 1025 1029 1030 1031 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2075 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 3036 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3048 3051 3052 3053

Blocks (070600): 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2055

Blocks (070700): 2000 2001 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2024 2026

Sevier County

VTD: 1-2 Jones Cove

VTD: 3-1 New Center

VTD: 3-2 Vocational Ctr. Harrisbg.

VTD: 5-2 Senior Citizens Bldg.

Blocks (080500): 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3030 3032 3033 3034 3037 3038 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3071

Blocks (080801): 1003

VTD: 7-1 Voting Machine Warehouse

VTD: 7-2 Catlettsburg

VTD: 8-1 Kodak

VTD: 8-2 Underwood

District 18:

Knox County

VTD: 42 Pleasant Ridge

Blocks (003901): 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1030

Blocks (004700): 1000 1001 1002 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 2019 2028 2031

VTD: 44 Ridgedale

Blocks (003802): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008

Blocks (004607): 1000 1001 1021 1022 1029 2002 2003 2004 2005 2008 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2034 2035 2041

Blocks (004608): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1014 1015 2000 2001 2002 2003 2005 2006 2007 2008 2012 2017

Blocks (004700): 2004 2005 2008 2009 2016 2018 2029 2030 2032 2033

VTD: 45 Bearden Middle

VTD: 46 West Hills

VTD: 47 Bearden High

VTD: 51 Deane Hill Recreation Center

VTD: 55 Lonas

Blocks (004607): 1019 1020 1023 2000 2001 2006 2007 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2024 2029 2030 2031 2037 2038 2039 2040

Blocks (004608): 1013 2004 2009 2010 2013 2015 2019 2020

Blocks (004613): 1000 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1017 2018 2019 2020

Blocks (004614): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011

VTD: 67 North Cedar Bluff

Blocks (004609): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3010 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027

Blocks (004611): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1057 1058 1059 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1072 1074 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016

VTD: 68 South Cedar Bluff

VTD: 68E East Cedar Bluff

VTD: 71 Rocky Hill

Blocks (004401): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055

Blocks (004403): 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3044 3045 3047

Blocks (005701): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041

District 19:

Knox County

VTD: 26 Dogwood

Blocks (005501): 1003 1005 1011 1012

VTD: 28 South-Doyle Middle

Blocks (002300): 2000 2002 2007 2013 2032

VTD: 29 Anderson

VTD: 57 Hills

VTD: 58 Pedigo

Blocks (006205): 1006 1007 1008 1009 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014

Blocks (006206): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1007 1008 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006

Blocks (006301): 1039 1040 1041 1042 1057 1058 1059 1060 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067

VTD: 60 Fort Sumpter

VTD: 76 Sunnyview

VTD: 77 Ramsey

VTD: 78 Riverdale

VTD: 79 Dora Kennedy

VTD: 80 Corryton

VTD: 81 Gibbs

VTD: 82 Ellistown

VTD: 84 Ritta

VTD: 85 Skaggston

VTD: 86 Carter

VTD: 87 Thorngrove

VTD: 88 Kings

VTD: 92 Gap Creek

VTD: 93 Hopewell

District 20:

Blount County

VTD: Big Springs

VTD: Eagleton 20th

VTD: Eagleton 8th

VTD: Eagleton Cafeteria

VTD: Eagleton-Alcoa

VTD: Everett

VTD: Fairview-City

Blocks (011102): 3021 3022 3047

Blocks (011503): 1000

VTD: Fairview-County

VTD: Friendsville-City

VTD: Friendsville-County

VTD: John Sevier

VTD: Louisville

VTD: Martin Luther King

VTD: Maryville High School

Blocks (010600): 1041 1042 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 3000 3002 3004 3005 3007 3008 3011 3012 3013 3016 3017

Blocks (011102): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3023 3024 3025 3026 3036 3037 3039 3040 3041 3050

Blocks (011200): 3090 3091 3104 3105 3106 3116 3118 3119

VTD: Maryville Middle School

VTD: Maryville Municipal-City

VTD: Maryville Municipal-County

VTD: Middlesettlements

VTD: Miser Station

VTD: Pellissippi

VTD: Pellissippi-Alcoa

VTD: Pellissippi-Maryville

VTD: William Blount Academy

VTD: William Blount-City

VTD: William Blount-County

District 21:

Loudon County

VTD: Browder

VTD: Davis

VTD: Eatons

Blocks (060100): 1018 1019 1020 1021 1023 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2119 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2139 2140 2141 2142 2143 2144 2145 2146 2147 2148 2149 2150 2151 2152 2153 2154 2155 2156 2157 2158 2159 2160 2161 2162 2163 2164 2165 2166 2167 2168 2169 2170 2171 2172 2173 2174 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3081 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3088 3089 3090 3091 3092 3093 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3101 3102 3103 3104 3105 3106 3107 3108 3109 3110 3111 3112 3113 3114 3115 3116 3117 3118 3119 3120 3121 3122 3123 3124 3125 3126 3127 3128 3129 3130 3131 3132 3133 3134 3135 3136

Blocks (060201): 1000 1022 1025 2061 2070

Blocks (060202): 1000 1002 1005 1024 1025 1026 1055 1056

Blocks (060301): 2038 2039 2041 2082 2083

VTD: Glendale

Blocks (060400): 1041 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2062 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2119 2120 2121 2122 2124 2142

VTD: Greenback

VTD: Lenoir City

Blocks (060201): 2000 2001 2003 2004 2006 2007 2011 2012 2013 2014 2027 2037 2203 2204 2205 2206

Blocks (060202): 1019 1021 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1040 1041 1042 1043 1045 1046 1047 1048 1062 1068 1069 1070 1071 1077 1078 1079 1081 1082 1090 1091 1092 1093 1104 2006 2007 2008 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3053 3054 3055 3058 3059 4000 4001 4002 4003 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4020 4021 4022 4024 4025 4026 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020 5021 5022 5023 5024 5025 5026 5027 5028 5029 5030 5031 5032 5033 5034 5035 5036 5037 5038 5039

Blocks (060301): 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2084 2086 2094 2095 2099 2100 2105 2106 2110 2111 2119

VTD: Lenoir City Outside

Blocks (060202): 1018 1020 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1038 1039 1044 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1080 5009

VTD: Loudon

VTD: Loudon Outside

VTD: Luttrell

VTD: Philadelphia

VTD: Tellico Village

VTD: Tellico Village East

Monroe County

VTD: 01 Sweetwater High School

VTD: 02 Broad Street School

VTD: 03 Brown Elementary

VTD: 04 Vonore Elementary School

VTD: 05 Madisonville Inter. School

Blocks (925300): 2002 2012 2013 2027 3000 3002 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3061 3063 3064 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3074 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4055 5000 5001 5002 5003 5009 5010 5011 5012 5017 5018

Blocks (925400): 1043 1044 1045 1048 1062 1066 1071 1072 1073 1074 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1100 1101 1102 2026 2036 3000 3001 3004 3008 3009 3012 3013 3014 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3081 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3088 3089 3090 3091 3092 3093 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3101 3102 3103 3104 3105 3106 3107 3108 3109 3110 3111 4011 4013 4014 4016 4020 4021 4022 4023 4079 4080 4081 4082 4083 4084 4085 4109 4110 4114 5001 5002 5003 5004

VTD: 06 Madisonville Middle School

Blocks (925300): 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1030 1052 1053 1061 1062 1063 1064 1068 2000 2001 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2014 2015 2016 2017 2020 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2028 2030 2031 2033 2034 2035 2036 2043 2044 2045 2046 2054 2055 2056 3001 3003 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3060 3062 3065 3072 3073 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5013 5014 5016 5031

Blocks (925400): 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010

VTD: 07 Madisonville Primary School

Blocks (925000): 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078

Blocks (925400) 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1023 1024 1026 1039 1040 1041 1042 1046 1047 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1063 1064 1065 1067 1068 1069 1070 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1099 1103 1104 1105 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 3002 3003 3005 3006 3007 3010 3011 3015 3024 3025 3026 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4012 4015 4017 4018 4019 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4054 4059 4060 4061 4062 4063 4064 4065 4066 4067 4068 4069 4070 4071 4072 4073 4074 4075 4076 4077 4078 4093 4094 4095 4096 4097 4098 4099 4100 4101 4102 4103 4104 4105 4106 4107 4108 4111 4112 4113 5000 5025 5026

VTD: 08 Vonore Community Center

District 22:

Bradley County

VTD: 103-1 Hopewell

VTD: 202-1 Charleston

VTD: 401 Oak Grove

VTD: 402 Michigan Avenue

VTD: 601-1 Valley View

VTD: 602-1 Blue Spring

VTD: 604-1 Black Fox

Meigs County

Polk County

District 23:

McMinn County

Monroe County

VTD: 05 Madisonville Inter. School

Blocks (925300): 5019 5020 5022

VTD: 06 Madisonville Middle School

Blocks (925300): 2032 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2058 4056 5015 5021 5024 5025 5026 5032 5033 5038 5039 5040 5045 5046 5047 5048 5049 5050 5051 5052 5053 5054 5055 5056 6014 6027 6037

Blocks (925400): 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018

VTD: 07 Madisonville Primary School

Blocks (925000): 1270

VTD: 09 Old Notchey Creek School

VTD: 10 Rural Vale Fire Dept

VTD: 11 Tellico Community Center

VTD: 12 Coker Creek School

VTD: 14 Toqua Community Center

District 24:

Bradley County

VTD: 101-1 McDonald

VTD: 102-1 Prospect

VTD: 201-1 E.L. Ross

VTD: 301-1 Lee University

VTD: 302-1 Senior Center

VTD: 501-1 T.C. Bower

VTD: 502-1 Community Serv

VTD: 603-1 Waterville

VTD: 701 Stuart

VTD: 702 Cleveland High

District 25:

Cumberland County

Putnam County

VTD: 04A Burks Middle School

VTD: 04B Monterey City Hall

Van Buren County

District 26:

Hamilton County

VTD: 013 Courthouse

Blocks (003100): 1000 1001 1002 1008 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1052 1053 1054 1055 1104 1122 1123 1124 1127 1128 1129 1130

VTD: 015 Downtown

Blocks (003100): 1003 1006 1007 1009 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1086 1087 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1100 1101 1102 1103 1109 1110 1111 1116 1117 1118 1136 1137 1138

VTD: 016 DuPont

VTD: 025 Hixon 1

VTD: 029 Lupton City

VTD: 035 North Chattanooga 1

VTD: 036 Northgate

VTD: 042 Riverview

VTD: 044 Stuart Heights 1

VTD: 051 Birchwood

Blocks (010104): 2006 2007

VTD: 058 Harrison 1

VTD: 059 Meadowview
